Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 3

Municipal Electric System Tax Equivalent Law of 1987

7-52-301. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Municipal Electric System Tax Equivalent Law of 1987.”

Acts 1987, ch. 84, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§7-52-301 —7-52-306 (Acts 1969, ch. 237, §§ 1-6; T.C.A., §§ 6-1538 — 6-1543; Acts 1981, ch. 457, § 1), which concerned tax equivalent payments for municipal electric plants, was repealed by Acts 1987, ch. 84, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. A generation facility constructed by the McMinnville Electric System (MES) to maintain and perform contractual obligations under agreements with the Tennessee Valley authority should be included in the calculation of the “net plant value” of MES for purposes of determining the amount of payments in lieu of taxes on property and operations owed to McMinnville and Warren County by MES pursuant to T.C.A. §7-52-301 et seq.; and MES was not entitled to a credit from McMinnville and Warren County for the amounts already paid, OAG 02-080, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 84 (7/15/02).

7-52-302. Purpose — Construction.

The purpose of this part is to provide the complete law of this state with respect to payments in lieu of taxes on the property and operations of all electric systems owned and operated by incorporated cities or towns, by counties, and by metropolitan governments, and to repeal the specific provisions of any private act, home rule charter or metropolitan government charter, or any part thereof, relating to payments in lieu of taxes, including certain provisions relating to the distribution of any such payments, but not to repeal any other provisions of such private acts or charters or parts of private acts or charters.

This part is remedial in nature and this part shall be liberally construed to effectuate the purpose of this part.

Acts 1987, ch. 84, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§7-52-301 –7-52-306 (Acts 1969, ch. 237, §§ 1-6; T.C.A., §§ 6-1538–6-1543; Acts 1981, ch. 457 § 1), which concerned tax equivalent payments for municipal electric plants, was repealed by Acts 1987, ch. 84, § 1.

7-52-303. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Assessment ratio in effect” means that assessment ratio being applied by the comptroller of the treasury in assessing electric system property of electric cooperatives and electric membership corporations for ad valorem taxation or, if such assessment function ceases to be performed by the comptroller of the treasury, that assessment ratio applied by any authorized department, agency, comptroller of the treasury, or official of the state empowered to so apply such an assessment ratio in assessing electric system property of electric cooperatives and electric membership corporations;

“Average of revenue less power cost from electric operations for the preceding three (3) fiscal years” means an amount derived by:

Determining for each of the three (3) fiscal years immediately preceding the beginning of the current fiscal year the electric system's total operating revenues for the year less any operating revenue amounts deemed uncollectible and written off for the year, net of any such amounts reinstated during the year that had been written off in any prior fiscal year, and accounting for any extraordinary items attributable to any prior fiscal year's total operating revenue or uncollectible amounts, and totaling the three (3) yearly amounts so determined;

Determining for each of the same three (3) fiscal years described in subdivision (a)(2)(A)(i) the total costs of purchased power excluding any charges for facilities' rental and accounting for any extraordinary items attributable to any prior fiscal year's purchased power costs and totaling the three (3) yearly amounts so determined; and

Subtracting the total in subdivision (a)(2)(A)(ii) from the total in subdivision (a)(2)(A)(i) and dividing the resulting remainder by three (3);

For purposes of subdivision (a)(2)(A), “any prior fiscal year” means any fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 1984. Also, for purposes of subdivision (a)(2)(A), all amounts described are those attributable only to electric system operations within Tennessee;

“Electric operations” means all activities associated with the establishment, development, and administration of an electric system and the business of supplying electricity and associated services to the public, including, but not limited to, the generation, purchase, and sale of electric energy and the purchase, use and consumption of electric energy by ultimate consumers;

“Electric system” means all tangible and intangible property and resources of every kind and description used or held for use in the purchase, generation, transmission, distribution, and sale of electric energy;

“Equalized property tax rate” of any taxing jurisdiction means the actual ad valorem property tax rate in effect for the calendar year in which the fiscal year begins multiplied by the applicable state, county, or municipal appraisal ratio for such taxing jurisdiction as determined, adopted, or applied by the state board of equalization, referred to in this part as “state board”, or, in the absence of such action by the state board, by any authorized department, agency, commission, or official of the state empowered to determine, adopt, or apply an appraisal ratio for such taxing jurisdiction;

“Appraisal ratio” means the ratio of appraised values of record to one hundred percent (100%) of current values that are to be derived in accordance with applicable state law for use in ad valorem property tax determinations each tax year. However, if no appraisal ratio is determined, adopted, applied, as provided in this subdivision (a)(5)(A), “appraisal ratio” shall, for purposes of this part, have the numerical value of one (1);

For purposes of this part, the equalized property tax rate that is in effect for any taxing jurisdiction as of the beginning of any electric system fiscal year shall be the same as an equalized property tax rate calculated for such taxing jurisdiction for that tax year, which is the calendar year, in which the fiscal year begins, using the actual property tax rate in effect for, and the appraisal ratio applicable for, such taxing jurisdiction for such tax year;

“Fiscal year” means the year beginning July 1 of each calendar year;

“Municipality” means any incorporated city or town, metropolitan government, or county that now or hereafter owns and operates an electric system and buys all or part of its power requirements for resale and distribution from the Tennessee Valley authority;

“Net plant value of the electric plant” means the depreciated original cost of the electric plant, in service and held for future use, and the book value of construction work in progress, all as shown on the books of the electric system and all of which are for use in the generation, transmission, and distribution of electricity;

For purposes of subdivision (a)(8)(A):

“Electric plant” does not include that portion of any electric system properties that a municipality owns, operates, and maintains to perform contractual obligations, under agreements with the Tennessee Valley authority, requiring the municipality to:

Take the net output of a specified electric generating facility of the Tennessee Valley authority into the municipality's electric system; and

Deliver all or portions of such net output to the transmission system of the Tennessee Valley authority or to other electric facilities as specified by the Tennessee Valley authority; and

The account, “electric plant purchased or sold,” as prescribed by the federal energy regulatory commission's uniform system of accounts, shall be excluded;

“Private act” includes, without limitation, the charter and any amendments to the charter of any home rule municipality or any metropolitan government;

“Supervisory body” means any board or other agency of a municipality established to supervise the management and operation of its electric system and electric operations, or, in the absence of a board or other agency, the governing body of the municipality; and

“Taxing jurisdiction” means any county, incorporated city or town, or metropolitan government in Tennessee having the power to levy taxes, or any special taxing district in Tennessee on behalf of which ad valorem property taxes may be levied, for the support of governmental and related activities and services.

Terms appearing in this part, except where specifically defined, have the meanings defined or ascribed to them in the federal energy regulatory commission's uniform system of accounts applicable to electric system operations.

Acts 1987, ch. 84, § 4; 1995, ch. 305, § 80.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§7-52-301 –7-52-306 (Acts 1969, ch. 237, §§ 1-6; T.C.A., §§ 6-1538–6-1543; Acts 1981, ch. 457 § 1), which concerned tax equivalent payments for municipal electric plants, was repealed by Acts 1987, ch. 84, § 1.

7-52-304. Tax equivalents authorized — Conditions and limitations.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary appearing in §7-34-115 or in the provisions of any private act, home rule or metropolitan government charter, every municipality may pay or cause to be paid from its electric system revenues for each fiscal year an amount for payments in lieu of taxes, called “tax equivalents” in this part, on its electric system and electric operations, which, in the judgment of the municipality's governing body after consultation with the supervisory body, shall represent the fair share of the cost of government properly to be borne by the municipality, subject, however, to the following conditions and limitations:

The total amount so paid as tax equivalents for each fiscal year shall not exceed a maximum amount equal to the sum of the following:

With respect to each of the respective taxing jurisdictions in which the municipality's electric system is located, the equalized property tax rate, determined as provided in this part, for the taxing jurisdiction as of the beginning of such fiscal year, multiplied by the net plant value of the electric plant and the book value of materials and supplies within the taxing jurisdiction as of the beginning of such fiscal year, multiplied by the assessment ratio in effect as of the beginning of such fiscal year; and

Four percent (4%) of the average of revenue less power costs from electric operations for the preceding three (3) fiscal years;

Such tax equivalent payments shall be made only from electric system revenues remaining after payment of, or making reasonable provision for payment of:

Current electric system operating expenses, including salaries, wages, cost of materials and supplies, power at wholesale and insurance;

Current payments of interest on indebtedness incurred or assumed by the municipality for the acquisition, extension, or improvement of the electric system, and the payment of principal amounts of such indebtedness, including sinking fund payments, when due;

Reasonable reserves for renewals, replacements and contingencies; and

Cash working capital adequate to cover operating expenses for a reasonable number of weeks;

The total amount to be paid as tax equivalents for each fiscal year shall be in lieu of all state, county, city and other local taxes or charges on the municipality's electric system and electric operations, except as provided in subdivision (6). Accordingly, after initial determination of such total tax equivalent amount to be paid in the absence of any such taxes or charges, such total tax equivalent amount shall be reduced by the aggregate amount of any such taxes or charges imposed for such fiscal year on the municipality's electric system or electric operations by or for the benefit of the respective taxing jurisdictions, including the municipality, in which the municipality's electric system is located and in which such electric operations are conducted, whether or not such taxes or other charges were imposed by the respective taxing jurisdictions receiving the benefit of such taxes or charges. Any amount allocated to any such taxing jurisdiction other than a municipality, as provided in § 7-52-306 or § 7-52-307, shall be reduced by the aggregate amount of any such taxes or charges imposed for that fiscal year for the benefit of that taxing jurisdiction. Only the respective amounts remaining after the allocated amounts provided for in this subdivision (3) have been so reduced shall be actually paid to the municipality and to such respective taxing jurisdictions;

The total amount to be paid as tax equivalents, including that to be paid for a municipality and any other taxing jurisdiction, for each fiscal year, determined in accordance with and subject to this part, shall be set forth in a resolution adopted by the municipality's governing body after consultation with the supervisory body, and the municipality's electric system shall pay to the municipality and any other taxing jurisdictions the amounts as provided in the resolution. Such determination shall be made as early in such fiscal year as possible and shall become final at the end of such fiscal year; provided, that if no such determination is made by the municipality by the end of such fiscal year, the total amount actually expensed, consistent with this part, by the electric system as of the end of such fiscal year shall constitute a final determination; provided, further, that any reductions in such amount required by subdivision (3), to the extent not made during such fiscal year, shall be made as early as possible in the succeeding fiscal year until the full adjustments are completed;

Notwithstanding subdivisions (1)-(4), until the first fiscal year in which the aforementioned maximum amount for equivalents, calculated as provided in subdivision (1), exceeds the tax equivalent amount for the twelve (12) months ended June 30, 1987:

The maximum tax equivalent amount that may be paid for any fiscal year shall not be less than the tax equivalent amount for the twelve (12) months ended June 30, 1987; and

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in any private act, home rule or metropolitan government charter, or in the provisions of § 7-52-309, any distribution payment to a taxing jurisdiction for any fiscal year shall not be greater than the amount paid to such taxing jurisdiction for the twelve (12) months ended June 30, 1987;

For purposes of subdivision (5)(A), “tax equivalent amount for the twelve (12) months ended June 30, 1987” means the tax equivalent amount actually expensed for, and applicable to such twelve (12) months, consistent with the power contract, in effect during such twelve (12) months, between the municipality and the Tennessee Valley authority. Thereafter, such maximum amount for any fiscal year shall not exceed the maximum amount calculated as provided in subdivision (1). All such maximum amounts shall be subject to the conditions and limitations of subdivisions (2), (3) and (4); and

Notwithstanding anything in subdivisions (1)-(5) that might be construed to the contrary, properly authorized retail sales or use taxes on electric power or energy at the same rates applicable generally to sales or use of personal property or services, including natural or artificial gas, coal, and fuel oil, as well as electric power or energy, imposed upon the vendees or users of electric power or energy by the state, a county, or a city, including a municipality, on a statewide, countywide, or citywide basis, respectively, shall not be considered a tax or charge on the municipality's electric system or its electric operations or properties for purposes of this part.

Acts 1987, ch. 84, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§7-52-301 –7-52-306 (Acts 1969, ch. 237, §§ 1-6; T.C.A., §§ 6-1538–6-1543; Acts 1981, ch. 457 § 1), which concerned tax equivalent payments for municipal electric plants, was repealed by Acts 1987, ch. 84, § 1.

7-52-305. Execution of amendatory contracts.

If the Tennessee Valley authority tenders to a municipality, as described in this part, a contract to amend an existing power contract consistent with this part, the governing body of the municipality and the supervisory body shall promptly execute such amendatory contract on behalf of the municipality.

Acts 1987, ch. 84, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§7-52-301 –7-52-306 (Acts 1969, ch. 237, §§ 1-6; T.C.A., §§ 6-1538–6-1543; Acts 1981, ch. 457 § 1), which concerned tax equivalent payments for municipal electric plants, was repealed by Acts 1987, ch. 84, § 1.

7-52-306. Contracts for distribution of tax equivalent amounts.

Any municipality acting in its capacity as a taxing jurisdiction and any other taxing jurisdiction within the boundaries of which any part of such municipality's electric system is located are hereby authorized to, on and after July 1, 1987, from time to time, make and perform contracts for distribution among them of the tax equivalent amounts provided for in this part. Any such contract may provide for such distribution on any basis that is satisfactory to the contracting parties; provided, that the contract shall be consistent in all respects with this section and §7-52-304. Nothing in this part shall have the effect of impairing in any way the obligations of the parties under any existing contract for such distribution in effect on July 1, 1987, or invalidating any established arrangement for such distribution in effect on July 1, 1987, and all such contracts and established arrangements are hereby expressly validated. For purposes of this part, an established arrangement is one under which the municipality has made a distribution payment to another taxing jurisdiction by general understanding, and the payment has been accepted by the taxing jurisdiction for the fiscal year or calendar year immediately preceding the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1987.

Acts 1987, ch. 84, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§7-52-301 –7-52-306 (Acts 1969, ch. 237, §§ 1-6; T.C.A., §§ 6-1538–6-1543; Acts 1981, ch. 457 § 1), which concerned tax equivalent payments for municipal electric plants, was repealed by Acts 1987, ch. 84, § 1.

7-52-307. Payments to taxing jurisdictions.

The municipality's governing body, in the resolution provided for in §7-52-304(4), except to the extent otherwise provided in any contract, established arrangement authorized or validated under §7-52-306, or distribution provisions of any private act, home rule or metropolitan government charter, shall direct payment of the tax equivalent amounts to the taxing jurisdictions in which its electric plant in service is located on the following basis and subject to the following terms and conditions:

For each fiscal year, the municipality shall allocate twenty-two and one-half percent (22.5%) of the total tax equivalent paid for that fiscal year as provided in § 7-52-304(1), or § 7-52-304(5) where applicable, to payments in lieu of all taxes or other charges for the benefit of county taxing jurisdictions. The municipality shall divide the amount so allocated among such county taxing jurisdictions in proportion to the ratios of the net plant values of the electric plant and the book values of materials and supplies within the boundaries of the respective county taxing jurisdictions to the total net plant value and the total book value of materials and supplies, and make such reductions as may be required under § 7-52-304(3) and (4). If the municipality is, itself, a county taxing jurisdiction, it shall be entitled to retain for itself, in addition to any other tax equivalents, its respective proportionate share of the twenty-two and one-half percent (22.5%) amount;

For each fiscal year, the municipality shall allocate to each city taxing jurisdiction, other than itself, in lieu of all taxes or other charges for the benefit of that city taxing jurisdiction, an amount equal to the equalized property tax rate of such other city taxing jurisdiction multiplied by the net plant value of the electric plant, plus the book value of materials and supplies located within the boundaries of such other city taxing jurisdiction multiplied by the assessment ratio, and make such reductions as may be required under § 7-52-304(3) and (4);

The maximum to be paid into the municipality's general fund shall be the balance of the total tax equivalent, after deducting the amounts determined under subdivisions (1) and (2); and

Notwithstanding subdivisions (1)-(3), until the first fiscal year in which the maximum amount for tax equivalents, calculated as provided in § 7-52-304(1), exceeds the tax equivalent amount for the twelve (12) months ended June 30, 1987, any distribution payment to a taxing jurisdiction for any fiscal year shall not be greater than the amount paid to such taxing jurisdiction for the twelve (12) months ended June 30, 1987.

Acts 1987, ch. 84, § 8.

7-52-308. Operations in adjacent states.

In the event a municipality conducts electric system operations outside the state, the maximum tax equivalent specified in this part shall not preclude the municipality's collecting from the electric system the additional amounts necessary to make appropriate tax or tax equivalent payments to taxing jurisdictions in the adjacent state or states in which the electric system operations are conducted in accordance with the applicable statutory requirements of such adjacent state or states.

Acts 1987, ch. 84, § 9.

7-52-309. Distribution by private act or home rule or metropolitan government charter.

Notwithstanding §7-52-307, in the event any tax equivalent distribution provisions of any private act, home rule or metropolitan government charter direct that the tax equivalent amount to be distributed to each taxing district is to be an amount arrived at by applying the current ad valorem tax rate in that district to the depreciated original cost of the electric system's tangible property, including materials and supplies, used or usable in electric operations in that district, such distribution provisions, which are subject to §7-52-304(5), shall continue in effect until such time as §7-52-304(5) ceases to be applicable, and shall then be repealed. Thereafter, in the absence of any contract as provided in §7-52-306, the municipality shall allocate the total tax equivalent paid for each fiscal year, to each taxing jurisdiction, in proportion to the ratio of:

The value arrived at by adding the net plant value of the electric plant and the book value of materials and supplies within the boundaries of such taxing jurisdiction and multiplying that sum by the equalized property tax rate of such taxing jurisdiction; to

The total of such values calculated for all taxing jurisdictions, and make such reductions as may be required under § 7-52-304(3) and (4).

Acts 1987, ch. 84, § 10.

7-52-310. Repeal of conflicting provisions.

Except as otherwise expressly provided in this part, all acts or parts of acts, including parts of any private act, or home rule, or metropolitan government charter, in conflict with this part are, to the extent of such conflict with this part, repealed.

Acts 1987, ch. 84, § 11.